Georgia, session 2025_26, HB5.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act relating to the board of commissioners of Decatur County, approved March 4, 1935
(Ga. L. 1935, p. 630), as amended, particularly by an Act approved May 6, 2015
(Ga. L. 2015, p. 3718), is amended by revising Section 2 as follows:
"SECTION 2.
All members of the board of commissioners shall not be less than 21 years of age and shall
be qualified electors of Decatur County. Each of the commissioners shall have been a
resident of his or her respective commission district for at least 12 months prior to the date
of taking office. In the event that any member ceases to be a resident of his or her
H. B. 5
- 1 -

LC 47 3159/AP
respective commission district during his or her term of office, a vacancy shall be created
and shall be filled in the manner hereinafter provided. Each of the members shall be
elected by the qualified voters of Decatur County residing within his or her respective
commission district. In all elections conducted pursuant to this Act, each candidate shall
designate, at the time of qualifying, the district from which he or she offers as a candidate.
To be elected as a member of the board, a candidate must receive the highest number of
votes cast for the seat he or she is seeking; and, at the same time, a candidate must receive
a majority of the total votes cast for the election of a commissioner to that seat. In the
event no candidate for a particular seat receives a majority of the votes for the seat he or
she is seeking, a run-off election shall be conducted for that particular seat. All members
shall be nominated and elected in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 2 of Title 21
of the O.C.G.A., the 'Georgia Election Code,' as now or hereafter amended."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 5
- 2 -